Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-701
Fiscal year, commencement.

The fiscal year of each city of the first class and of any public utility of a city of the first class commences on October 1 and extends through the following September 30 except as provided in the Municipal Proprietary Function Act.

Laws 1901, c. 18, § 40, p. 242;

R.S.1913, § 4972;

C.S.1922, § 4141;

C.S.1929, § 16-701;

R.S.1943, § 16-701;

Laws 1963, c. 67, § 1, p. 267;

Laws 1995, LB 194, § 1;

Laws 2016, LB704, § 172.

Municipal Proprietary Function Act, see section 18-2801.